test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VTA_AM_IND_waabam_gt-glossing.yaml
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg+2+Pl:   gwaabmisiim
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg+1+Pl:   gwaabmisiimi
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl: gwaabmisnoonnim
     #2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl: gwaabmisnoonim      #1sg v 2pl #book
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl: gwaabmigoosiim
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl: gwaabmaaswaanaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl: gwaabmaaswaawaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl: gwaabmigsiiwaa
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl: nwaabmaaswaanaa
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl: nwaabmigsiinaa

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg+Prt:   gwaabmisiinaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg+Dub:   gwaabmisiinaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+Prt: gwaabmisnoonnaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+Dub: gwaabmisnoonnaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+Prt: gwaabmigoosiinaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+Dub: gwaabmigoosiinaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Prt: gwaabmaasiiba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Dub: gwaabmaasiidig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Prt: gwaabmigsiiba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Dub: gwaabmigsiidig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Prt: nwaabmaasiiba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Dub: nwaabmaasiidig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Prt: nwaabmigsiiba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Dub: nwaabmigsiidig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+3+4:  waabmaasiin     #3obv v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+3+4:  waabmigsiin   #3sg v 3obv

     #2 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5), (4, 6), (4, 7)
     #                      (5, 6), (5, 7)
     #                      (6, 7)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaawaa
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaa
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl: nwaabmigsiinaa
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl:  waabmigsiinaawaa      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Prt: gwaabmigsiinaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Dub: gwaabmigsiinaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Prt: nwaabmigsiinaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Dub: nwaabmigsiinaadig
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Prt:  waabmigsiinaaba      #0sg v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Dub:  waabmigsiinaadig     #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiinan
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+0+Pl: nwaabmigsiinan
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+0+Pl:  waabmigsiinan      #0pl v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -i    (Thm2, 1 obj)
     #      -in   (Thm1Sg, 2 obj)
     #      -igoo (Thm1Pl 1pl v 2)
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg+2+Pl+Prt:   gwaabmisiimwaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg+2+Pl+Dub:   gwaabmisiimwaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg+1+Pl+Prt:   gwaabmisiimnaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm2+Neg+1+Pl+Dub:   gwaabmisiimnaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmisnoonnimwaaba
     #2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmisnoonmwaaba  #1sg v 2pl #book
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmisnoonnimwaadig
     #2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Sg+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmisnoonmwaadig  #1sg v 2pl #book
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigoosiimwaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+Thm1Pl+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigoosiimwaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabmaasiimnaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: gwaabmaasiimnaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmaaswaawaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmaaswaawaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigsiimnaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigsiimnaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigsiiwaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigsiiwaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabmaasiimnaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: nwaabmaasiimnaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabmigsiimnaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: nwaabmigsiimnaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: gwaabmaaswaanaanig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: gwaabmaaswaawaag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaanig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+Pl: gwaabmigsiiwaag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: nwaabmaaswaanaanig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+3+Pl: nwaabmigsiinaanig
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+3+4:   waabmaaswaawaan      #3pl v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+3+4:   waabmigsiiwaan      #3obv v 3pl

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmaasiibniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmaasiidgenag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmigsiibniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmigsiidgenag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: nwaabmaasiibniig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: nwaabmaasiidgenag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: nwaabmigsiibniig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: nwaabmigsiidgenag
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Prt+3+4:   waabmaasiibniin     #3sg v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+Dub+3+4:   waabmaasiidgenan    #3sg v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Prt+3+4:   waabmigsiibniin     #3obv v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+Dub+3+4:   waabmigsiidgenan    #3obv v 3sg

     #3 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5, 6), (4, 5, 7), (4, 6, 7)
     #                      (5, 6, 7)

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigsiinaawaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigsiinaawaadig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+Prt: gwaabmigsiimnaaba
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+Dub: gwaabmigsiimnaadig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+Prt: nwaabmigsiimnaaba
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+Dub: nwaabmigsiimnaadig
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+Prt:  waabmigsiinaawaaba      #0sg v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+Dub:  waabmigsiinaawaadig      #0sg v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaawaan
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaanin
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+0+Pl: nwaabmigsiinaanin
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+0+Pl:  waabmigsiinaawaan      #0pl v 3pl

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaabniin
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaadgenan
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl: nwaabmigsiinaabniin
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl: nwaabmigsiinaadgenan
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Prt+0+Pl:  waabmigsiinaabniin    #0pl v 3sg
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+Dub+0+Pl:  waabmigsiinaadgenan   #0pl v 3sg

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -aa   (ThmDir, 3 obj)
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmaasiimnaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmaasiimnaadgenag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmaaswaawaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmaaswaawaadgenag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmigsiimnaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmigsiimnaadgenag
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwaabmigsiiwaabniig
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwaabmigsiiwaadgenag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: nwaabmaasiimnaabniig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: nwaabmaasiimnaadgenag
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: nwaabmigsiimnaabniig
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: nwaabmigsiimnaadgenag
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4:   waabmaaswaawaabniin       #3pl v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmDir+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4:   waabmaaswaawaadgenan      #3pl v 3obv
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4:   waabmigsiiwaabniin       #3obv v 3pl (0sg too?)
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4:   waabmigsiiwaadgenan      #3obv v 3pl (0sg too?)

     #4 non-neg slots ...   (4, 5, 6, 7)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     #  theme sign order: 
     #      -igo  (ThmInv, pre=obj)
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaawaabniin
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiinaawaadgenan
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiimnaabniin
     2+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: gwaabmigsiimnaadgenan
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+Prt+0+Pl: nwaabmigsiimnaabniin
     1+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+1+Pl+Dub+0+Pl: nwaabmigsiimnaadgenan   
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+Prt+0+Pl:  waabmigsiinaawaabniin    #0pl v 3pl
     3+waabmaa+VTA+ThmInv+Neg+0+2+Pl+Dub+0+Pl:  waabmigsiinaawaadgenan   #0pl v 3pl
